Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-615
Orphanages and other homes; establishment; certified copy of charter to be filed.

Fraternal, benevolent and charitable organizations in this state which may adopt the provisions of sections 21-612 to 21-614, and which shall establish homes, or funds therefor, in accordance therewith, shall, in the case where a grand lodge or grand body desires to hold the property of such home or its funds in its own name, file with the Secretary of State a certified copy of its charter together with a statement of the number of trustees or directors authorized by it to transact the business pertaining to such home or homes or funds. In case a grand body mentioned in section 21-613 shall organize an auxiliary corporation for such purpose as provided in section 21-612, then and in such case such auxiliary corporation shall file with the Secretary of State a copy of its articles of association, duly certified by the secretary of such association.

Laws 1907, c. 30, § 4, p. 159;

R.S.1913, § 615;

C.S.1922, § 509;

C.S.1929, § 24-612;

R.S.1943, § 21-615.